Utah statutes.
23-25-13.   Licensing authority -- Administrator -- Expenses.

(1)  The Division of Wildlife Resources is designated as the licensing authority in this state for the purpose of the compact.

(2)  The director of the Division of Wildlife Resources shall furnish to the appropriate authorities of the participating states any information or documents reasonably necessary to facilitate the administration of the compact.

(3)  The compact administrator provided for in Section 23-25-8, "Wildlife Violator Compact," shall not be entitled to any additional compensation for his service as the administrator but shall be entitled to expenses incurred in connection with his duties and responsibilities as administrator in the same manner as for expenses incurred in connection with any other duties or responsibilities of his office or employment.

